New Mexico, session 2026, HB231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the State Rules Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] DISTRIBUTION OF RULEMAKING TO THE LEGISLATURE.--Every agency shall provide to the legislative council service an email address for the custodian of rulemaking records, and the legislative council service shall maintain that list for distribution to legislators." .233072.1